District of Columbia statutes.
41-125

Determination of claims by Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor shall within 30 days of the receipt of any claim either pay the claim or give written notice to the claimant of a denial in whole or in part. Upon a denial or a failure by the Mayor to respond within 30 days, the claimant may request a hearing on the claim. Upon such request the Mayor shall hold a hearing and receive evidence in accordance with § 2-509.

(b)

If the claim is determined in favor of the claimant, the Mayor shall make payment of only that amount which the Mayor actually received plus any dividends or interest allowed under § 41-121. The claim shall be paid without deduction for costs of notices or sale or for service charges.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 125, 27 DCR 5150

Section References

This section is referenced in § 41-127.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 42-225.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 20 of the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act (1966 Act).

This section is also based upon § 24(b) and (c) of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).